Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Forest Products Council

154.47-100.
Definitions for KRS 154.47-105 to 154.47-120. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 104, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

154.47-105.
Legislative findings. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 104, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

154.47-110.
Kentucky Forest Products Council. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 104, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 224, § 19, effective July 15, 1994; 2004, ch. 105, § 18, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 206, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

154.47-120.
Purposes of council. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 104, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 224, § 20, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.